Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB99.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 510.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape in the third degree when:
(a) Being twenty-one (21) years old or more, he or she engages in sexual
intercourse with another person less than sixteen (16) years old;
(b) Being at least ten (10) years older than a person who is sixteen (16) or
seventeen (17) years old at the time of sexual intercourse, he or she engages in
sexual intercourse with the person;
(c) Being twenty-one (21) years old or more, he or she engages in sexual
intercourse with another person less than eighteen (18) years old and for
whom he or she provides a foster family home as defined in KRS 600.020;
(d) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as defined
in KRS 532.045, he or she engages in sexual intercourse with a minor under
eighteen (18) years old with whom he or she comes into contact as a result of
that position;
(e) Being a jailer, or an employee, contractor, vendor, or volunteer of the
Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, or a detention
facility as defined in KRS 520.010, or of an entity under contract with either
department or a detention facility for the custody, supervision, evaluation, or
treatment of offenders, he or she engages in sexual intercourse with[subjects]
a person who he or she knows is incarcerated, supervised, evaluated, or
treated by the Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice,
detention facility, or contracting entity[, to sexual intercourse];[ or]
(f) Being a peace officer, while serving in his or her official capacity, he or she
engages in sexual intercourse with[subjects] a person who the officer:
1. Arrested, held in custody, or investigated for commission of a traffic or
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 398
criminal offense; or
2. Knew or should have known was under arrest, held in custody, or being
investigated for commission of a traffic or criminal offense;
[to sexual intercourse]
(g) He or she engages in sexual intercourse with another person who is
incarcerated by the Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile
Justice, or a detention facility;
(h) Being a Commonwealth's attorney or assistant Commonwealth's attorney,
or a county attorney or assistant county attorney, he or she engages in
sexual intercourse with another person who the attorney is prosecuting for
criminal offense, unless a prior sexual relationship exists; or
(i) Being an attorney for a criminal defendant, he or she engages in sexual
intercourse with the criminal defendant, unless a prior sexual relationship
exists.
(2) Rape in the third degree is a Class D felony.
Section 2. KRS 510.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sodomy in the third degree when:
(a) Being twenty-one (21) years old or more, he or she engages in deviate sexual
intercourse with another person less than sixteen (16) years old;
(b) Being at least ten (10) years older than a person who is sixteen (16) or
seventeen (17) years old at the time of deviate sexual intercourse, he or she
engages in deviate sexual intercourse with the person;
(c) Being twenty-one (21) years old or more, he or she engages in deviate sexual
intercourse with another person less than eighteen (18) years old and for
whom he or she provides a foster family home as defined in KRS 600.020;
(d) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as defined
in KRS 532.045, he or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse with a minor
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 398
less than eighteen (18) years old with whom he or she comes into contact as a
result of that position;
(e) Being a jailer, or an employee, contractor, vendor, or volunteer of the
Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, or a detention
facility as defined in KRS 520.010, or of an entity under contract with either
department or a detention facility for the custody, supervision, evaluation, or
treatment of offenders, he or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse
with[subjects] a person who he or she knows is incarcerated, supervised,
evaluated, or treated by the Department of Corrections, Department of
Juvenile Justice, detention facility, or contracting entity[, to deviate sexual
intercourse];[ or]
(f) Being a peace officer, while serving in his or her official capacity, he or she
engages in deviate sexual intercourse with[subjects] a person who the
officer:
1. Arrested, held in custody, or investigated for commission of a traffic or
criminal offense; or
2. Knew or should have known was under arrest, held in custody, or being
investigated for commission of a traffic or criminal offense;
[to deviate sexual intercourse]
(g) He or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse with another person who is
incarcerated by the Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile
Justice, or a detention facility;
(h) Being a Commonwealth's attorney or assistant Commonwealth's attorney,
or a county attorney or assistant county attorney, he or she engages in
deviate sexual intercourse with another person who the attorney is
prosecuting for criminal offense, unless a prior sexual relationship exists;
or
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 398
(i) Being an attorney for a criminal defendant, he or she engages in deviate
sexual intercourse with the criminal defendant, unless a prior sexual
relationship exists.
(2) Sodomy in the third degree is a Class D felony.
Section 3. KRS 510.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual abuse in the second degree when:
(a) He or she is at least eighteen (18) years old but less than twenty-one (21)
years old and subjects another person who is less than sixteen (16) years old
to sexual contact;
(b) Being a jailer, or an employee, contractor, vendor, or volunteer of the
Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, or a detention
facility as defined in KRS 520.010, or of an entity under contract with either
department or a detention facility for the custody, supervision, evaluation, or
treatment of offenders, he or she subjects a person who is at least eighteen
(18) years old and who he or she knows is incarcerated, supervised, evaluated,
or treated by the Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice,
detention facility, or contracting entity, to sexual contact;[ or]
(c) Being a peace officer, while serving in his or her official capacity, he or she
subjects a person who the officer:
1. Arrested, held in custody, or investigated for commission of a traffic or
criminal offense; or
2. Knew or should have known was under arrest, held in custody, or being
investigated for commission of a traffic or criminal offense;
to sexual contact;
(d) He or she subjects another person who is incarcerated by the Department of
Corrections, Department of Juvenil Justice, or a detention facility to sexual
contact;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 398
(e) Being a Commonwealth's attorney or assistant Commonwealth's attorney,
or a county attorney or assistant county attorney, he or she subjects another
person who the attorney is prosecuting for criminal offense to sexual
contact, unless a prior sexual relationship exists; or
(f) Being an attorney for a criminal defendant, he or she subjects the criminal
defendant to sexual contact, unless a prior sexual relationship exists.
(2) In any prosecution under subsection (1)(a) of this section, it is a defense that:
(a) The other person's lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by
reason of being less than sixteen (16) years old; and
(b) The other person was at least fourteen (14) years old; and
(c) The actor was less than five (5) years older than the other person.
(3) Sexual abuse in the second degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/2/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed